Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-156
County board; chairman; term; duties.

The board of county commissioners at its regular meeting in January of each year shall elect a chairman of the board to serve for the ensuing year, and such chairman shall sign all warrants on the treasurer for money to be paid out of the county treasury.

Laws 1879, § 59, p. 371;

Laws 1887, c. 29, § 3, p. 360;

Laws 1891, c. 21, § 2, p. 228;

R.S.1913, § 984;

Laws 1921, c. 154, § 1, p. 636;

C.S.1922, § 884;

C.S.1929, § 26-138;

R.S.1943, § 23-156.

Warrants issued by county board are void if not for purpose within their jurisdiction. Oakley v. Valley County, 40 Neb. 900, 59 N.W. 368 (1894).